Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. As used in sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Certified dental laboratory technician” means a dental laboratory technician who  is
certified by the National Board for Certification in Dental Laboratory Technology,  or its
successor organization, as approved by the Health Licensing Office by rule.
(2) “Dental laboratory” means a facility where one or more dental laboratory technicians
make, provide, repair or alter dental prosthetic appliances and other artificial materials  and
devices that are returned to a dentist  and inserted into the human oral cavity, or that come
into contact with the human oral cavity’s adjacent structures and tissues, of a  dental pa-
tient.
(3) “Dental  laboratory technician” means a person who, pursuant to a dentist’s pre-
scribed work order, makes, provides, repairs or alters dental prosthetic appliances and other
artificial materials and devices that are returned  to the dentist and inserted into the human
oral cavity, or that  come into contact with the human oral cavity’s adjacent structures and
tissues, of the dentist’s patient.
(4) “Dentist” means a dentist licensed under ORS chapter 679.
(5) “Material content disclosure” means a notice provided to a dentist  by a dental labo-
ratory that includes:
(a) The name, physical address and registration number of the dental laboratory;
(b) The city, state and country of  origin where the technological work under the work
order was performed in whole or in part;
(c) The city, state and country of the dental laboratory or dental laboratories  that man-
ufactured or repaired,  directly or indirectly, the dental prosthetic appliances or other artifi-
cial materials and devices ordered under the work order; and
(d) So  that the dentist may include the information in the patient’s record, the man-
ufacturer and brand name or the  United States Food and Drug Administration registration
number of all patient contact materials used in a dental  prosthetic appliance or other arti-
ficial material or device that is inserted into the human oral cavity, or that comes into
contact with the human oral cavity’s adjacent structures and  tissues, of the dentist’s pa-
tient.
(6) “Responsible person” means the person who:
Enrolled House Bill 2594 (HB 2594-INTRO) Page 1
(a) Controls a majority interest in a dental laboratory; or
(b) Is primarily responsible for the  supervision of the day-to-day operations of the dental
laboratory.
(7) “Work order” means a written instrument prescribed by  a dentist that directs a
dental laboratory to, for an individual patient, make, provide, repair or alter one or  more
dental prosthetic appliances  or other artificial materials or devices that will be returned to
the dentist and inserted into the human oral cavity, or that will come into contact  with the
human oral cavity’s adjacent structures and tissues, of the dentist’s patient.
SECTION 2.
(1) A dental laboratory may not operate or do business in this  state unless
the dental laboratory holds an active registration issued by the Health Licensing Office under
section 3 of this 2025 Act.
(2) A dental laboratory is considered to operate or do business in this state if the dental
laboratory is physically located within this state or prepares work product pursuant to  a
work order that originated from a dentist licensed in this state.
(3)(a) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to a dental laboratory that:
(A) Is in a dental office;
(B) Is owned and operated by and under the supervision of a practicing dentist; and
(C) Does not perform work pursuant to work orders that originate from outside  of the
dentist’s practice.
(b) A dental laboratory described in paragraph (a) of this  subsection shall annually file
with the office:
(A) The address of the dental laboratory; and
(B) The name, license number and contact information of the dentist described  in para-
graph (a) of this subsection.
(4) A dental laboratory operated as  part of an educational program is not required to
register under section 3 of  this 2025 Act if the dental laboratory is operated solely for the
purpose of allowing students to perform duties that are part of a  supervised course of study
in an educational program that meets any of the accreditation standards described in ORS
chapter 679.
(5) Sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act do not apply to services authorized under:
(a) ORS 680.010 to 680.205 when performed by  a dental hygienist licensed under ORS
680.010 to 680.205; or
(b) ORS 680.500 to 680.565 when performed by a denturist licensed under ORS  680.500 to
680.565.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Health  Licensing Office may issue a dental laboratory registration
to an applicant that  submits a completed application and pays the fee established under ORS
676.576. The application must include:
(a) The name, mailing address, phone number and electronic  mail address of the dental
laboratory;
(b) The physical address of the dental laboratory if different than the mailing address;
(c) The name, mailing address, phone number  and electronic mail address of the re-
sponsible person or the name and license number of the dentist who supervises  the dental
laboratory;
(d) An attestation by the responsible person or the dentist supervising the dental  labo-
ratory that the dental laboratory meets the infectious  disease control requirements of the
federal Occupational Safety  and Health Administration and the Centers for Disease Control
and Prevention; and
(e) An attestation by the responsible person or the dentist supervising the dental labo-
ratory that the dental laboratory will comply with the requirements of section 4  of this 2025
Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2594 (HB 2594-INTRO) Page 2
(2) To be eligible for registration under this section, the applicant must include with the
application documentation that the applicant,  or an employee of the applicant who works at
least 30 hours per week in the dental laboratory:
(a) Has  successfully completed, during the 12 months immediately preceding the appli-
cation for registration, at least 12  hours of continuing education in dental laboratory tech-
nology approved or accepted by the National  Board for Certification in Dental Laboratory
Technology, or its successor organization, and by the Health Licensing Office;
(b) Is a certified dental laboratory technician in good standing; or
(c) Is a dentist.
(3) The office  shall assign a registration number to each registered dental laboratory.
The dental laboratory shall include the dental laboratory  registration number on all invoices
and other correspondence of the dental laboratory.
(4) A dental laboratory registered under  this section shall maintain a qualified employee
as described in subsection (2) of this section.
(5) A dental laboratory registration is valid for one year.
SECTION 4.
(1) A dental laboratory registered under section 3 of this 2025 Act  shall
provide to a prescribing dentist who submits a work order to the dental laboratory:
(a) A material content disclosure for each dental prosthetic appliance or  other artificial
material or device in a manner that is easily entered into the patient record; and
(b) The  point of origin of the manufacture of each dental prosthetic appliance or other
artificial material or device ordered under the work order.
(2) If a dental prosthetic appliance or other artificial  material or device ordered under
the work order was partially or entirely manufactured by one  or more third parties, the
point of origin disclosure described in subsection (1) of this section must identify:
(a) The portion of the dental prosthetic appliance  or other artificial material or device
that was manufactured by the third party; and
(b) The city, state and country of each third party.
SECTION 5.
In the manner prescribed  in ORS chapter 183 for contested cases, the Health
Licensing Office may impose a form of discipline listed in ORS 676.612 against a dental  labo-
ratory registered under section 3 of this 2025  Act for any violation of sections 1 to 5 of this
2025 Act or rules adopted under sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act or for the commission  of a
prohibited act described in ORS 676.612.
SECTION 6. Violation of section 2 of this 2025 Act is a Class B violation.
SECTION 7. The Health Licensing Office  may adopt rules to carry out sections 1 to 5 of
this 2025 Act.
SECTION 8.  Section 3 of this 2025 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1) The Health Licensing Office may issue a dental laboratory registration to an appli-
cant that submits a completed application and  pays the fee established under ORS 676.576. The ap-
plication must include:
(a) The name,  mailing address, phone number and electronic mail address of the dental labora-
tory;
(b) The physical address of the dental laboratory if different than the mailing address;
(c) The  name, mailing address, phone number and electronic mail address of the responsible
person or the name and license number of the dentist who supervises the dental laboratory;
(d) An attestation  by the responsible person or the dentist supervising the dental laboratory that
the dental laboratory meets the infectious disease control requirements of the  federal Occupational
Safety and Health Administration and the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention; and
(e) An attestation by  the responsible person or the dentist supervising the dental laboratory that
the dental laboratory will comply with the requirements of section 4 of this 2025 Act.
[(2) To be eligible for registration under this section, the applicant  must include with the applica-
tion documentation that the applicant, or an employee of the applicant who works at least 30 hours per
week in the dental laboratory: ]
Enrolled House Bill 2594 (HB 2594-INTRO) Page 3
[(a) Has  successfully completed, during the 12 months immediately preceding the application for
registration, at least  12 hours of continuing education in dental laboratory technology approved or ac-
cepted by the  National Board for Certification in Dental Laboratory Technology, or its successor or-
ganization, and by the Health Licensing Office; ]
[(b) Is a certified dental laboratory technician in good standing; or ]
[(c) Is a dentist. ]
(2)(a) To be eligible for registration under this section, the  applicant must include with
the application documentation that the dental laboratory:
(A) Employs a certified  dental laboratory technician who is in good standing with the
National Board for Certification in Dental  Laboratory Technology, or its successor organ-
ization, and approved by the Health Licensing Office by rule, and who works at least 30 hours
per week in the dental laboratory; or
(B) Is operated under the supervision of a dentist who works at least 30 hours  per week
in the dental laboratory.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply  to a dental laboratory that provides
to the office documentation that the dental laboratory has been continuously owned and op-
erated by the same individual since January 1, 2013.
(3) The office shall  assign a registration number to each registered dental laboratory. The dental
laboratory shall include the dental laboratory registration number on all invoices and other corre-
spondence of the dental laboratory.
(4) A dental laboratory registered under  this section shall maintain a qualified employee as de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section.
(5) A dental laboratory registration is valid for one year.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 679.176 is amended to read:
679.176. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Sub-work order” means  a written instrument by which a dental laboratory regis-
tered under section 3 of this 2025 Act subcontracts all or part of the work directed to be done
by a work order prescribed by a dentist licensed under ORS chapter 679.
(b) “Work order” has the meaning given that term in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
[(1)] (2) [ No dentist may ] A dentist may not  use the  services of any person[ ,] who is not li-
censed to practice dentistry in  this state[ , to construct, alter, repair, reline, reproduce or duplicate any
prosthetic denture, bridge, appliance or any other structure to be worn in the human mouth, ] to make,
provide, repair or alter dental prosthetic appliances or other artificial materials or  devices
that are returned to a dentist and inserted into the  human oral cavity, or that come into
contact with the human oral cavity’s adjacent structures and tissues,  unless the dentist first
[furnishes to such] provides to the person a [ written] work order, in substantially the following form:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(Date) , 2
TO: (Name  of dental [ technician or ] laboratory with address)  (Dental laboratory registration
number)
RE: (Name or number of patient)
(Description of the work to be done,  including diagrams if necessary, together with specifica-
tions of the type of materials to be used.)
(Name of ordering dentist)
(Address) 
(Current license number) 
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(3) A person that receives a work order prescribed by a  dentist under subsection (1) of
this section may  not engage as a subcontractor another person that is not authorized to
Enrolled House Bill 2594 (HB 2594-INTRO) Page 4
perform the services necessary to complete the work order unless the person that receives
the work order first provides to  the subcontractor a sub-work order in substantially the
following form:
(Date) , 2
TO: (Name of subcontracted dental laboratory with address) (Subcontracted dental labora-
tory registration number, if applicable)
RE: (Name or number of patient)
(Description of  the work to be done, including diagrams if necessary, together with
specifications of the type of materials to be used.)
(Name of ordering dental laboratory)
(Address) 
(Current dental laboratory registration number) 
_______________________________________________________________________________________
[(2) A duplicate copy of each such work order issued by the dentist shall be retained by each
dentist for not less than two years. The Oregon Board of Dentistry or its agents  shall be permitted to
inspect, upon demand, the duplicate copies of all such work orders retained by each dentist. ]
(4)(a) A dentist shall retain for at least two years from the  date of prescription a dupli-
cate copy of each work order prescribed by the dentist.  The Oregon Board of Dentistry, or
an agent of the board, may inspect, upon demand, the duplicate copies  of all work orders and
sub-work orders retained pursuant to this paragraph.
(b) A  person described in subsection (3) of this section shall attach a duplicate copy of
each sub-work order issued by the person to  a duplicate copy of the associated work order
and shall retain the  duplicate copies for at least two years from the date of issuance. The
Health Licensing Office, or an agent of the office, may inspect, upon demand,  the duplicate
copies of all work orders and sub-work orders retained pursuant to this paragraph.
(5) A work order or sub-work order may be transmitted or retained in  an electronic
format.
[(3)] (6) [ No work order shall ] A work order may not  permit or require the taking of im-
pressions of any part of the human oral cavity by any person [ not a dentist licensed by the board ]
who is not a dentist licensed under ORS chapter 679  or a denturist licensed under ORS
680.500 to 680.565.
SECTION 10.  ORS 676.565 is amended to read:
676.565. Pursuant to ORS 676.568, the Health Licensing  Office shall provide administrative and
regulatory oversight and centralized service for the following boards, councils and programs:
(1) Board of Athletic Trainers, as provided in ORS 688.701 to 688.734;
(2) Board of Cosmetology, as provided in ORS 690.005 to 690.225;
(3) State Board of Denture Technology, as provided in ORS 680.500 to 680.565;
(4) State Board of Direct Entry Midwifery, as provided in ORS 687.405 to 687.495;
(5) Respiratory Therapist and Polysomnographic Technologist Licensing Board,  as provided in
ORS 688.800 to 688.840;
(6) Environmental Health Registration Board, as provided in ORS chapter 700;
(7) Board of Electrologists and Body Art Practitioners, as provided in ORS 690.350 to 690.410;
(8) Advisory Council on Hearing Aids, as provided in ORS 694.015 to 694.170;
(9) Sexual Offense Treatment Board, as provided in ORS 675.365 to 675.410;
(10) Long Term Care Administrators Board, as provided in ORS 678.710 to 678.820;
(11) Board of Licensed Dietitians, as provided in ORS 691.405 to 691.485;
(12) Behavior Analysis Regulatory Board, as provided in ORS 676.806;
(13) Board of Certified Advanced Estheticians, as provided in ORS 676.630 to 676.660;
Enrolled House Bill 2594 (HB 2594-INTRO) Page 5
(14) Art therapy, as provided in ORS 681.740 to 681.758;
(15) Lactation consultation, as provided in ORS 676.665 to 676.689;
(16) Music therapy, as provided in ORS 681.700 to 681.730;
(17) Genetic counseling, as provided in ORS 676.730 to 676.748;
(18) State Board of Sign Language Interpreters, as provided in ORS 676.750 to 676.789; [ and]
(19) Temporary staffing agencies, as provided in ORS 676.695 to 676.725[ .]; and
(20) Dental laboratories, as provided in sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 676.579 is amended to read:
676.579. (1)(a) The Health  Licensing Office is under the supervision and control of a director,
who is responsible for the performance of the duties, functions and powers  and for the organization
of the office.
(b) The Director of the Oregon Health Authority shall establish the qualifications for and  ap-
point the Director of the Health Licensing Office, who holds office at the pleasure of the Director
of the Oregon Health Authority.
(c) The Director of the Health Licensing Office shall receive a  salary as provided by law or, if
not so provided, as prescribed by the Director of the Oregon Health Authority.
(d) The Director of the Health Licensing Office is in the unclassified service.
(2) The Director of the Health Licensing Office  shall provide the boards, councils and programs
administered by the  office with any services and employees as the office requires to carry out the
office’s duties. Subject to any applicable provisions of the State  Personnel Relations Law, the Di-
rector of the Health Licensing Office  shall appoint all subordinate officers and employees of the
office, prescribe their duties and fix their compensation.
(3) The Director of the Health Licensing Office is responsible for carrying  out the duties, func-
tions and powers under ORS 675.365 to 675.410, 676.560 to 676.625, 676.630 to 676.660, 676.665  to
676.689, 676.695 to 676.725, 676.730 to 676.748, 676.750 to 676.789, 676.810, 676.815,  676.825, 676.992,
678.710 to 678.820,  680.500 to 680.565, 681.700 to 681.730, 681.740 to 681.758, 687.405 to 687.495,
687.895, 688.701 to 688.734, 688.800 to 688.840, 690.005 to 690.225, 690.350 to 690.410,  691.405 to
691.485 and 694.015 to 694.170 and ORS chapter 700 and sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act .
(4) The enumeration of duties, functions and powers  in subsection (3) of this section is not in-
tended to be exclusive or to limit the  duties, functions and powers imposed on or vested in the office
by other statutes.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 676.590 is amended to read:
676.590. (1) Information  obtained by the Health Licensing Office as part of an investigation
conducted under the following laws and any reports issued by an investigator  are exempt from
public disclosure:
(a) ORS 676.630 to 676.660, 676.665  to 676.689, 676.695 to 676.725, 676.730 to 676.748, 676.750 to
676.789, 681.700 to 681.730, 681.740 to 681.758,  690.005 to 690.225, 690.350 to 690.410 or 694.015 to
694.170 or sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act .
(b) ORS 676.560 to 676.625 if the investigation is related to the regulation of:
(A) Advanced nonablative esthetics under ORS 676.630 to 676.660;
(B) Lactation consultation under ORS 676.665 to 676.689;
(C) Music therapy under ORS 681.700 to 681.730;
(D) Art therapy under ORS 681.740 to 681.758;
(E) Barbering, hair design, esthetics, nail technology or natural hair  care under ORS 690.005 to
690.225;
(F) Electrologists and body art practitioners under ORS 690.350 to 690.410;
(G) Dealing in hearing aids under ORS 694.015 to 694.170;
(H) Genetic counseling under ORS 676.730 to 676.748;
(I) Signed language interpretation under ORS 676.750 to 676.789; [ or]
(J) Temporary staffing agencies under ORS 676.695 to 676.725[ .]; or
(K) Dental laboratories under sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2594 (HB 2594-INTRO) Page 6
(2) The office shall disclose information obtained as part of an investigation described in  sub-
section (1) of this section to a person who  demonstrates by clear and convincing evidence that the
public interest in disclosure outweighs other interests in nondisclosure, including  the public interest
in nondisclosure.
(3) A complaint that forms the basis for an investigation described in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion shall  not be considered information obtained as part of an investigation and is not exempt from
public disclosure.
(4) Upon request, the office shall disclose to  a person against whom disciplinary action is sought
any information obtained as part of an investigation  described in subsection (1) of this section, if the
information is not otherwise privileged or confidential under state or federal law.
SECTION 13.  ORS 676.612 is amended to read:
676.612. (1) Subject to ORS 676.616 and  687.445, and in the manner prescribed in ORS chapter
183 for contested cases and as specified in ORS  675.385, 676.660, 676.685, 676.745, 676.777, 676.825,
678.780, 680.535, 681.733, 681.755, 687.445, 688.734,  688.836, 690.167, 690.407, 691.477, 694.147 and
700.111 and section 5 of this 2025 Act , the Health Licensing  Office may refuse to issue or renew,
may suspend or revoke or may otherwise condition or limit an authorization or may discipline or
place on probation an authorization holder for commission of  the prohibited acts listed in subsection
(2) of this section.
(2) A person subject to  the authority of a board, council or program listed in ORS 676.565
commits a prohibited act if the person engages in:
(a) Fraud, misrepresentation, concealment of material  facts or deception in applying for or ob-
taining an authorization to practice in this state, or in any written or oral communication to the
office concerning the issuance or retention of the authorization.
(b) Using,  causing or promoting the use of any advertising matter, promotional literature, testi-
monial, guarantee, warranty, label, insignia or any  other representation, however disseminated or
published, that is false, misleading or deceptive.
(c) Making a representation  that the authorization holder knew or should have known is false
or misleading regarding  skill or the efficacy or value of treatment or remedy administered by the
authorization holder.
(d) Practicing under a false, misleading or deceptive name, or  impersonating another authori-
zation holder.
(e) Permitting a person other than the authorization holder to use the authorization.
(f) Practicing with a physical or mental condition that presents an unreasonable risk of  harm
to the authorization holder or to  the person or property of others in the course of performing the
authorization holder’s duties.
(g) Practicing while under the influence of alcohol, cannabis, controlled  substances or other
skill-impairing substances, or engaging in the  illegal use of controlled substances or other skill-
impairing substances so as to create a risk  of harm to the person or property of others in the course
of performing the duties of an authorization holder.
(h) Failing to properly and reasonably accept responsibility for the actions of employees.
(i) Employing, directly or indirectly, any suspended, uncertified, unlicensed or unregistered  per-
son to practice a regulated  occupation or profession subject to the authority of the boards, councils
and programs listed in ORS 676.565.
(j) Unprofessional conduct, negligence, incompetence, repeated violations  or any departure from
or failure to conform to standards  of practice in performing services or practicing in a regulated
occupation or profession subject to the authority of the boards, councils and  programs listed under
ORS 676.565.
(k) Conviction of any criminal offense, subject to ORS  670.280. A copy of the record of con-
viction, certified by the clerk of the court entering the conviction,  is conclusive evidence of the
conviction.  A  plea of no contest or an admission of guilt is a conviction for purposes of this para-
graph.
Enrolled House Bill 2594 (HB 2594-INTRO) Page 7
(L) Failing to report any  adverse action, as required by statute or rule, taken against the au-
thorization holder by another regulatory jurisdiction or any  peer review body, health care institu-
tion, professional association, governmental agency, law enforcement agency or court  for acts or
conduct similar to acts or  conduct that would constitute grounds for disciplinary action as described
in this section.
(m) Violation of a statute regulating an occupation or  profession subject to the authority of the
boards, councils and programs listed in ORS 676.565.
(n) Violation of any rule regulating an occupation or  profession subject to the authority of the
boards, councils and programs listed in ORS 676.565.
(o) Failing to cooperate with the office in any investigation, inspection or request  for informa-
tion.
(p) Selling or fraudulently obtaining or furnishing an authorization  to practice in a regulated
occupation or profession subject to the authority of the boards, councils and  programs listed in ORS
676.565, or aiding or abetting such an act.
(q) Selling or fraudulently obtaining or furnishing any record related to practice in  a regulated
occupation or profession subject to the authority of the boards, councils and  programs listed in ORS
676.565, or aiding or abetting such an act.
(r) Failing to pay an outstanding civil penalty or fee that is due or failing to meet the terms  of
any order issued by the office that has become final.
(3) For the purpose of requesting  a state or nationwide criminal records check under ORS
181A.195, the office may require the fingerprints of a person who is:
(a) Applying for an authorization;
(b) Applying for renewal of an authorization; or
(c) Under investigation by the office.
(4) If the office places an authorization holder on  probation under subsection (1) of this section,
the office, in consultation with the  appropriate board, council or program, may determine and at any
time modify the conditions of the probation.
(5) If an authorization is suspended, the  authorization holder may not practice during the term
of suspension. Upon the expiration of the term of suspension, the authorization may  be reinstated
by the office if the conditions of  suspension no longer exist and the authorization holder has satis-
fied all requirements in the relevant statutes or administrative rules for issuance, renewal  or rein-
statement.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 676.613 is amended to read:
676.613. (1) In addition to all other remedies, when it appears to the Health Licensing Office that
a person is engaged in, has engaged in or is about to engage  in any act, practice or transaction that
violates any provision of ORS  675.365 to 675.410, 676.630 to 676.660, 676.665 to 676.689, 676.695 to
676.725, 676.730 to 676.748, 676.750 to 676.789, 676.810, 676.815, 678.710 to 678.820, 680.500 to 680.565,
681.700 to 681.730,  681.740 to 681.758, 687.405 to 687.495, 688.701 to 688.734, 688.800 to 688.840,
690.005 to 690.225, 690.350 to 690.410, 691.405 to 691.485 or  694.015 to 694.170 or ORS chapter 700
or sections 1 to 5  of this 2025 Act , the office may, through the Attorney General or the district
attorney of the  county in which the act, practice or transaction occurs or will occur, apply to the
court for an injunction restraining the person from the act, practice or transaction.
(2) A court may issue an injunction under this section  without proof of actual damages. An in-
junction issued under this section does not relieve a person from any other  prosecution or enforce-
ment action taken for violation of statutes listed in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 15.  ORS 676.622 is amended to read:
676.622. (1) A transaction conducted through a state  or local system or network that provides
electronic access to  the Health Licensing Office information and services is exempt from any re-
quirement under ORS 675.365 to 675.410, 676.560 to 676.625, 676.630 to  676.660, 676.665 to 676.689,
676.695 to 676.725, 676.730 to 676.748, 676.750 to 676.789, 676.810,  676.815, 676.992, 680.500 to 680.565,
681.700 to 681.730, 681.740 to 681.758, 687.405 to 687.495, 688.701 to 688.734, 688.800  to 688.840,
690.005 to 690.225, 690.350 to 690.410, 691.405 to 691.485 and 694.015 to 694.170 and  ORS chapter 700
Enrolled House Bill 2594 (HB 2594-INTRO) Page 8
and sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act , and rules adopted thereunder, requiring an original  signature
or the submission of handwritten materials.
(2) Electronic signatures subject to ORS 84.001 to  84.061 and facsimile signatures are acceptable
and have the same force as original signatures.
SECTION 16.  ORS 676.992 is amended to read:
676.992. (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, and  in addition to any other
penalty or remedy provided by law, the Health Licensing Office may impose a civil  penalty not to
exceed $5,000 for each violation  of the following statutes and any rule adopted under the following
statutes:
(a) ORS 688.701 to 688.734 (athletic training);
(b) ORS 690.005 to 690.225 (cosmetology);
(c) ORS 680.500 to 680.565 (denture technology);
(d) Subject to ORS 676.616 and 687.445, ORS 687.405 to 687.495 (direct entry midwifery);
(e) ORS 690.350 to  690.410 (tattooing, electrolysis, body piercing, earlobe piercing, dermal im-
planting and scarification);
(f) ORS 694.015 to 694.170 (dealing in hearing aids);
(g) ORS 688.800 to 688.840 (respiratory therapy and polysomnography);
(h) ORS chapter 700 (environmental sanitation);
(i) ORS 675.365 to 675.410 (sexual abuse specific treatment);
(j) ORS 678.710 to 678.820 (nursing home administrators and residential care facility adminis-
trators);
(k) ORS 691.405 to 691.485 (dietitians);
(L) ORS 676.612 (prohibited acts);
(m) ORS 676.802 to 676.830 (applied behavior analysis);
(n) ORS 681.700 to 681.730 (music therapy);
(o) ORS 676.630 to 676.660 (advanced nonablative esthetics procedure);
(p) ORS 681.740 to 681.758 (art therapy);
(q) ORS 676.665 to 676.689 (lactation consultation);
(r) ORS 676.730 to 676.748 (genetic counseling); [ and]
(s) ORS 676.750 to 676.789 (signed language interpretation)[ .]; and
(t) Sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act (dental laboratories).
(2) The office may take any other disciplinary action that it finds proper, including  but not
limited to assessment of costs of disciplinary proceedings, not to exceed $5,000, for violation of any
statute listed in subsection (1) of this section  or any rule adopted under any statute listed in sub-
section (1) of this section.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not limit the amount of the civil penalty resulting from a
violation of ORS 694.042.
(4) In imposing a civil penalty under this  section, the office shall consider the following factors:
(a) The immediacy and extent to which the violation threatens the public health or safety;
(b) Any prior violations of statutes, rules or orders;
(c) The  history of the person incurring a penalty in taking all feasible steps to correct any vi-
olation;  and
(d) Any other aggravating or mitigating factors.
(5) Civil penalties under this section shall be imposed as provided in ORS 183.745.
(6) The moneys received by the office from civil  penalties under this section shall be deposited
in the Health  Licensing Office Account and are continuously appropriated to the office for the ad-
ministration and enforcement of the laws the office  is charged with administering and enforcing that
govern the person against whom the penalty was imposed.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 679.010 is amended to read:
679.010. As used in this chapter and ORS 680.010  to 680.205, unless the context requires other-
wise:
Enrolled House Bill 2594 (HB 2594-INTRO) Page 9
(1) “Dental assistant” means a person who, under the supervision of a dentist  or dental thera-
pist, renders assistance to a dentist, dental therapist, dental hygienist, dental  technician or another
dental assistant or who, under the supervision of  a dental hygienist, renders assistance to a dental
hygienist providing dental hygiene.
(2) “Dental hygiene” is that portion of dentistry that includes, but is not limited to:
(a) The rendering of educational, preventive and therapeutic dental services and diagnosis and
treatment planning for such services;
(b) Prediagnostic risk assessment, scaling, root planing, curettage, the application of  sealants
and fluoride and any related intraoral  or extraoral procedure required in the performance of such
services;  and
(c) Prescribing, dispensing and  administering prescription drugs for the services described in
paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(3) “Dental hygienist” means  a person who, under the supervision of a dentist, practices dental
hygiene.
(4) “Dental technician” means a person who, at the authorization of a  dentist, makes, provides,
repairs or alters  [ oral] dental prosthetic appliances and other artificial materials and devices that
are returned to a dentist and  inserted into the human oral cavity or that come in contact with its
adjacent structures and tissues.
(5) “Dental therapist” means a person licensed to practice dental therapy under ORS 679.603.
(6) “Dental therapy” means the provision of preventive dental care,  restorative dental treatment
and other educational, clinical  and therapeutic patient services as part of a dental care team, in-
cluding the services described under ORS 679.621.
(7) “Dentist” means a person who may perform any intraoral or  extraoral procedure required
in the practice of dentistry.
(8) “Dentist of record” means a dentist that either  authorizes treatment for, supervises treat-
ment of or provides treatment for a patient in a dental office or clinic owned or operated by an in-
stitution as described in ORS 679.020 (3).
(9)(a) “Dentistry” means the healing art concerned with:
(A) The  examination, diagnosis, treatment planning, treatment, care and prevention of conditions
within the human oral cavity and  maxillofacial region, and of conditions of adjacent or related tis-
sues and structures; and
(B) The  prescribing, dispensing and administering of prescription drugs for purposes related to
the activities described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(b) “Dentistry” includes, but is not limited to:
(A) The cutting, altering, repairing, removing, replacing or repositioning of  hard or soft tissues
and other acts or procedures as determined by the Oregon Board of Dentistry and included in the
curricula  of:
(i) Dental  schools accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American
Dental Association;
(ii) Post-graduate training programs; or
(iii) Continuing education courses.
(B) The prescription and administration of vaccines.
(10) “Direct supervision” means supervision requiring that a dentist diagnose the  condition to
be treated, that a dentist authorize the procedure to be performed, and  that a dentist remain in the
dental treatment room while the procedures are performed.
(11) “Expanded practice dental hygienist” means  a dental hygienist who performs dental hygiene
services in accordance with ORS 680.205 as authorized by an expanded practice  dental hygienist
permit issued by the board under ORS 680.200.
(12) “General supervision” means supervision requiring that a  dentist authorize the procedures
by standing orders,  practice agreements or collaboration agreements, but not requiring that a den-
tist be present when the  authorized procedures are performed. The authorized procedures may also
be performed at a place other than the usual place of practice of the dentist.
Enrolled House Bill 2594 (HB 2594-INTRO) Page 10
(13) “Indirect supervision” means supervision requiring that a  dentist authorize the procedures
and that a dentist be on the premises while the procedures are performed.
SECTION 18. ORS 679.530 is repealed.
SECTION 19. (1) Sections 1 to 5 of this 2025  Act, the amendments to ORS 676.565, 676.579,
676.590, 676.612, 676.613, 676.622, 676.992, 679.010 and 679.176 by  sections 9 to 17 of this 2025
Act and the repeal of ORS 679.530 by section 18 of this 2025 Act become  operative on July
1, 2026.
(2) The amendments to section  3 of this 2025 Act by section 8 of this 2025 Act become
operative on January 1, 2030.
(3) The Health Licensing Office may take any  action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section  that is necessary to enable the office to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the office by sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act, the amendments  to
ORS 676.565, 676.579, 676.590, 676.612, 676.613, 676.622, 676.992, 679.010 and 679.176  by sections
9 to 17 of this 2025 Act and the repeal of ORS 679.530 by section 18 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 20. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House April 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2594 (HB 2594-INTRO) Page 11